Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 2
GENERAL PROVISIONS

19-3-201. Venue.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 9, 2023.]

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), all proceedings brought under this article shall be commenced in the county in which the child resides or is present.

A county department, guardian ad litem, or other person filing a petition for reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship as set forth in section 19-3-612 must file the petition for the reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship in
the county or city and county that has legal custody of the child.

(1) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 9, 2023.]

(a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, all proceedings brought pursuant to this article 3 must be commenced in the county in which the child resides or is present.

(b) A county department, guardian ad litem or counsel for youth, or other person filing a petition for reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship as set forth in section 19-3-612 must file the petition for the reinstatement of the parent-child
legal relationship in the county or city and county that has legal custody of the child.

(1.5) For purposes of determining proper venue, a child who is placed in the legal custody of a county department shall be deemed for the entire period of placement to reside in the county in which the child's legal parent or guardian resides or is located,
even if the child is physically residing in a foster care or residential facility located in another county. In such circumstance, if a child is placed out of the home, the court shall not transfer venue pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section during the period of out-of-home placement to any county other than the county in which the child's legal parent or guardian resides or is located.

When proceedings are commenced pursuant to this article 3 in a county other than that of the child's residence, the court in which proceedings were initiated may, on its own motion or on the motion of any interested party, transfer the case to the court
in the county where the child's legal parent or guardian resides or is located unless any of the following circumstances exist:

The transfer would be detrimental to the best interests of the child;

Adjudication has not taken place and the case has not been continued pursuant to section 19-3-505 (5);

The legal parent or guardian has a history of frequent moves unless there is evidence of stability in the most recent move indicating an intent to remain in the new residence for six or more months, such as the legal parent or guardian has signed a lease
whose term is six or more months;

The case is likely to be closed within three to six months;

The transfer will disrupt continuity or provisions of services; or

The case is an expedited permanency planning case, unless the requirements of subsection (3) of this section have been met. Pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the presumption that a transfer of the proceedings is not in the child's best interest
has been rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence.

(2.5) The county attorney of a county that files a motion to change venue pursuant to this section shall immediately provide notice of the motion to the proposed receiving county. Upon receipt of a motion to change venue, the court shall set a hearing
to rule on the motion. The requesting county attorney shall provide fourteen days written notice of the hearing to the office of the county attorney in the proposed receiving county, who shall have a right to file responsive
pleadings and appear at the hearing.

In a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123, if the child is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), it shall be presumed that any transfer of proceedings pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section without good cause shown that results in a delay in the judicial proceedings would be detrimental to the child's best interests. Such presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence.

An order granting a change of venue and transferring jurisdiction to the court in the county in which the child resides shall be effective fifteen days after the transferring court signs the order. Within thirty days after signing the order, the transferring
court shall forward the court file, including originals or certified copies of all documents and reports, to the receiving court.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (4)(b) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The order granting a change of venue and transferring jurisdiction shall include:

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (4)(b) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The order granting a change of venue and transferring jurisdiction must include:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b)(I) is effective until January 9, 2023.] Notice to the receiving court of whether a respondent parent's counsel and the guardian ad litem appointed for the child will remain on the case. If a respondent
parent's counsel or the guardian ad litem for the child will not remain on the case, the order shall inform the receiving court that the receiving court shall make a new appointment of counsel or guardian ad litem.

(I)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b)(I) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
Notice to the receiving court of whether a respondent parent's counsel and the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth appointed for the child will remain on the case. If a respondent parent's
counsel or the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth for the child will not remain on the case, the order must inform the receiving court that the receiving court shall make a new appointment of counsel or
guardian ad litem or counsel for youth.

Notice that the transferring court shall vacate any existing hearing date after the effective date of the order.

When venue is transferred, as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the receiving court shall proceed with the case as if the petition had been originally filed or adjudication had been originally made in that court. The receiving court shall hold
an initial hearing in the case within thirty days after the effective date of the order granting a change of venue and transferring jurisdiction to the receiving court.

A motion for change of venue shall be made in writing and shall include a certification by the moving party that the moving party has complied with all statutory requirements. The motion for change of venue shall be mailed to all parties and attorneys
of record in the case and to the county attorney in the receiving county.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 760, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 94:
(2) amended, p. 2053, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2010:
Entire section amended, (HB 10-1359), ch. 223, p. 968, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2014:
(1) amended, (SB 14-062), ch. 77, p. 315, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2016:
(2) amended and (1.5) and (2.5) added, (HB 16-1316), ch. 127, p. 362, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:
IP(2) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 18-1257), ch. 197, p. 1291, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2022:
(1), IP(4)(b), and (4)(b)(I) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 440, § 21, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-105 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-3-201.5. Change of venue - county department and county attorney responsibilities - rules.

Each county department shall designate a change of venue coordinator to facilitate the transfer of jurisdiction of a case between county departments.

Within fifteen days after a court signs an order pursuant to section 19-3-201 granting a change of venue and transferring jurisdiction, the transferring county department shall:

Provide written case information to the designated change of venue coordinator in the receiving county, which information shall include, but need not be limited to, permanency goals, target dates relating to the case, evaluations, a current family services
plan, court reports, dates of placement moves, the progress of the child in placement, all Title IV-E eligibility determinations pursuant to the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, and recommendations for continuing
progress in the case;

Update all documentation in the case file, including the record in the state automated system;

Provide information concerning, to the extent known, the physical location of the child's parents, guardians, legal custodians, and relatives; and

Schedule a family engagement meeting involving all parties, county department caseworkers and supervisors, and community providers; or

Conduct a case staffing between county caseworkers and supervisors in the transferring and receiving county departments; or

Submit a written case transfer summary.

Within fifteen days after a court signs an order pursuant to section 19-3-201 granting a change of venue and transferring jurisdiction, the transferring county attorney's office shall forward a complete copy of the case file, excluding any confidential
attorney-client communications, to the county attorney's office in the receiving county.

The state department shall promulgate, in accordance with the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., any rules necessary for the effective transfer of case responsibilities between county departments resulting from a change
of venue pursuant to section 19-3-201.

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire section added, (HB 10-1359), ch. 223, p. 969, § 2, effective September 1.

Cross references:
For Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.

19-3-202. Right to counsel and jury trial.

At the first appearance of a respondent parent, guardian, or legal custodian, the court shall fully advise the respondent of his or her legal rights, including the right to a jury trial, the right to be represented by counsel at every stage of the proceedings,
and the right to seek the appointment of counsel through the office of respondent parents' counsel established in section 13-92-103, C.R.S., if the respondent is unable to financially secure counsel on his or her own. The court
shall fully explain to the respondent the informational notice of rights and remedies for families prepared pursuant to section 19-3-212 and shall recommend that the respondent discuss such notice with his or her counsel. Further,
the court shall advise the respondent of the minimum and maximum time frames for the dependency and neglect process, including the minimum and maximum time frames for adjudication, disposition, and termination of parental rights
for a child who is under six years of age at the time the petition is filed in a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123. Nothing in this section limits the power of the court to appoint counsel prior to the filing of a
petition for good cause.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The petitioner, any respondent, or the guardian ad litem may demand a trial by jury of six persons at the adjudicatory hearing under section 19-3-505 or the court, on
its own motion, may order such a jury to try any case at the adjudicatory hearing under section 19-3-505.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The petitioner, any respondent, the guardian ad litem for the child, or a child who is twelve years of age or older may demand a trial by jury of six persons at the adjudicatory hearing pursuant to section 19-3-505,
or the court, on its own motion, may order such a jury to try any case at the adjudicatory hearing pursuant to section 19-3-505.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 761, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2003:
(1) amended, p. 1226, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2014:
(1) amended, (SB 14-203), ch. 281, p. 1141, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2015:
(1) amended, (HB 15-1149), ch. 116, p. 352, § 4, effective April 24.

L. 2022:
(2) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 434, § 8, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-106 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-3-203. Guardian ad litem.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 9, 2023.]

Upon the filing of a petition under section 19-3-502 that alleges abuse or neglect of a minor child, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem, who shall be an attorney-at-law licensed to practice in Colorado. Nothing in this section shall limit the
power of the court to appoint a guardian ad litem prior to the filing of a petition for good cause.

The guardian ad litem shall be provided with all reports relevant to a case submitted to or made by any agency or person pursuant to this article, including reports of examination of the child or persons responsible for the neglect or dependency of the
child. The county department shall share with the guardian ad litem the reports of fingerprint-based criminal history record checks from the Colorado bureau of investigation and from the federal bureau of investigation if the court
orders the county department to share that information with the guardian ad litem. The court and social workers assigned to the case shall keep the guardian ad litem apprised of significant developments in the case, particularly
prior to further neglect or dependency court appearances.

The guardian ad litem shall be charged in general with the representation of the child's interests. To that end, the guardian ad litem shall make such further investigations as the guardian ad litem deems necessary to ascertain the facts and shall talk
with or observe the child involved, examine and cross-examine witnesses in both the adjudicatory and dispositional hearings, introduce and examine the guardian ad litem's own witnesses, make recommendations to the court concerning
the child's welfare, appeal matters to the court of appeals or the supreme court, and participate further in the proceedings to the degree necessary to adequately represent the child. In addition, the guardian ad litem, if in the
best interest of the child, shall seek to assure that reasonable efforts are being made to prevent unnecessary placement of the child out of the home and to facilitate reunification of the child with the child's family or, if reunification
is not possible, to find another safe and permanent living arrangement for the child. In determining whether said reasonable efforts are made with respect to a child, and in making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and
safety shall be the paramount concern.

A guardian ad litem already appointed to represent a youth's best interests pursuant to this article 3 shall begin acting as counsel and providing client-directed representation immediately upon the youth's eighteenth birthday and shall act in this role
until either the case is dismissed or new counsel is appointed, unless the court determines a guardian ad litem is necessary due to the youth's diminished capacity, in which case the guardian ad litem shall remain in that role
and separate counsel for the youth shall be appointed.

At the first hearing following a youth's eighteenth birthday, the court shall advise each youth who has a current guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this section of the youth's right to counsel and the option to either consent to have the same person
continue as counsel, if the lawyer remains available and has no conflict of interest, or to have a new person appointed as counsel. If the youth elects to have a new person appointed as counsel, the court shall appoint an attorney
from the list of attorneys approved by the office of the child's representative.

19-3-203. Right to guardian ad litem and counsel for youth.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 9, 2023.]

Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to section 19-3-502 that alleges abuse or neglect of a child, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for any child who is under twelve years of age. The guardian ad litem must be an attorney-at-law licensed
to practice in Colorado and approved by the office of the child's representative created in section 13-91-104. Nothing in this section limits the power of the court to appoint a guardian ad litem prior to the filing of a petition
for good cause.

Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to section 19-3-502 that alleges abuse or neglect of a child, the court shall appoint counsel for youth for any child or youth who is twelve years of age or older. The counsel for youth must be an attorney-at-law
licensed to practice in Colorado and approved by the office of the child's representative created in section 13-91-104. The court may appoint the same attorney, as long as the attorney does not assert there is a conflict of interest
as defined under the applicable rules of professional conduct, to represent the best interests of younger siblings who are under twelve years of age as a guardian ad litem and to represent youth in the sibling group who are twelve
years of age or older as a counsel for youth. Until the court's jurisdiction is terminated, appointment of counsel for youth pursuant to this section continues. A child's or youth's right to counsel may not be waived. Nothing in
this section limits the power of the court to appoint counsel for youth prior to the filing of a petition for good cause.

A guardian ad litem who is currently appointed to represent the best interests of a child or youth pursuant to this section shall transition to client-directed counsel for youth immediately upon a child's twelfth birthday and act in this role until either
the case is dismissed or new counsel is appointed, unless the court finds it necessary to appoint a guardian ad litem because the child or youth has diminished capacity, in which case the guardian ad litem remains in that role
and the court shall appoint separate counsel for youth for the child. Counsel for youth shall notify the court and parties of the change, and the court shall issue a new order of appointment within seven days.

The guardian ad litem or counsel for youth must be provided with all reports relevant to a case submitted to or made by any agency or person pursuant to this article 3, including reports of examination of the child or youth or persons responsible for
the neglect or dependency of the child or youth. The county department shall share with the guardian ad litem or the counsel for youth the reports of fingerprint-based criminal history record checks from the Colorado bureau of
investigation and from the federal bureau of investigation if the court orders the county department to share that information with the guardian ad litem or the counsel for youth. The guardian ad litem or counsel for youth must
have access to the child or youth and confidential information regarding the child or youth, including but not limited to the child's or youth's educational, medical, and mental health records; social service agency files; court
records, including court files involving allegations of abuse or neglect of the child or youth; delinquency records involving the child or youth; and any other information regarding the child relevant to the issues in the proceeding
and reports that form the basis of recommendations made to the court. This section does not confer an independent right to obtain a parent's information or parent's records that are confidential or that are otherwise privileged
under state or federal law. The court and social workers assigned to the case shall keep the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth apprised of significant developments in the case, particularly prior to further neglect or dependency
court appearances.

The guardian ad litem is charged in general with the representation of the child's best interests. To that end, the guardian ad litem shall make such further investigations as the guardian ad litem deems necessary to ascertain the facts and shall talk
with or observe the child involved, examine and cross-examine witnesses in both the adjudicatory and dispositional hearings, introduce and examine the guardian ad litem's own witnesses, make recommendations to the court concerning
the child's welfare, appeal matters to the court of appeals or the supreme court, and participate further in the proceedings to the degree necessary to adequately represent the child. In addition, the guardian ad litem, if in the
best interest of the child, shall seek to assure that reasonable efforts are being made to prevent unnecessary placement of the child out of the home and to facilitate reunification of the child with the child's family or, if reunification
is not possible, to find another safe and permanent living arrangement for the child. In determining whether said reasonable efforts are made with respect to a child, and in making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and
safety are the paramount concern.

A person appointed to serve as counsel for youth pursuant to this section shall comply with the Colorado rules of professional conduct, provisions set forth in a chief justice directive concerning the court appointment of counsel for youth in this title
19, and subsequent chief justice directives or practice standards established by rule or directive of the chief justice pursuant to section 13-91-105 concerning the duties and responsibilities of a guardian ad litem and counsel
for youth in legal matters affecting children or youth. Counsel for youth shall ensure that the child or youth has representation through pending appeals.

A guardian ad litem may be appointed for a child or youth twelve years of age or older if necessary because the child or youth has diminished capacity. The court shall not consider age or developmental maturity as the sole basis for an appointment of
a guardian ad litem pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 761, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 92:
(1) amended, p. 224, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(3) amended, p. 2013, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(3) amended, p. 1417, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2001:
(3) amended, p. 846, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 2015:
(1) and (2) amended, (SB 15-087), ch. 263, p. 1012, § 8, effective June 2.

L. 2021:
(4) and (5) added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2215, § 4, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(4) amended, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 418, § 3, effective August 10; entire section amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 434, § 9, effective January 9, 2023.

19-3-204. Temporary protective custody. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 761, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 90:
Entire section repealed, p. 1037, § 6, effective April 3.

19-3-205. Continuing jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided in this article 3, the jurisdiction of the court over any child or youth adjudicated as neglected or dependent shall continue until the child or youth becomes eighteen and one-half years of age unless earlier terminated by
court order; except that:

If a determination is pending or the youth has been determined to be an incapacitated person pursuant to section 15-14-102, then jurisdiction continues until either the youth has made a complete transition into adult disability services and it is in the
youth's best interests for the juvenile court to terminate jurisdiction or the youth reaches twenty-one years of age or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law, whichever comes first;

If a youth is making the transition to adult services pursuant to section 25.5-6-409.5, then the court may extend jurisdiction until such transition is complete; or

Jurisdiction pursuant to this section is not required to be terminated due to age before October 1, 2021.

Repealed.

An eligible youth has the right to choose whether to participate in the foster youth in transition program created in section 19-7-303.

If a youth who is sixteen years of age or older but less than eighteen years of age and who is in the custody of a county department runs away, and the youth's whereabouts have been unknown for more than ninety days, then the county department may file
a motion to terminate jurisdiction.

The court shall set a hearing no later than thirty-five days after the county department files the motion to determine whether the county department has made reasonable efforts to locate the youth prior to terminating jurisdiction. The hearing may be
waived upon stipulation by all parties.

The motion must be withdrawn and the hearing may be vacated or converted to a review hearing if the youth returns.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 762, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2011:
Entire section amended, (HB 11-1079), ch. 83, p. 226, § 8, effective August 10.

L. 2017:
(2)(a)(II) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1394, § 41, effective May 25.

L. 2021:
(1) amended and (3) and (4) added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2216, § 5, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
IP(1) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2973, § 41, effective August 10; (2) repealed, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 418, § 4, effective August 10.

19-3-206. Representation of petitioner.

In all proceedings brought under this article, the petitioner shall be represented by a county attorney, special county attorney, or city attorney of a city and county.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 762, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-106 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-207. Inadmissibility of certain evidence.

Upon the request of the county attorney, special county attorney, or the city attorney of a city and county, the court shall set a hearing to determine the admissibility in a subsequent criminal proceeding arising from the same episode of information
derived directly from testimony obtained pursuant to compulsory process in a proceeding under this article. The district attorney of the judicial district in which the matter is being heard shall be given five days' written notice
of the hearing by the clerk of the court. Such hearing shall be held in camera, and the district attorney shall have the right to appear at the hearing and to object to the entry of the order holding such information inadmissible.
The court shall not enter such an order if the district attorney presents prima facie evidence that the inadmissibility of such information would substantially impair his or her ability to prosecute the criminal case. The provisions
of this subsection (1) shall not be construed to prevent any law enforcement officer from independently producing or obtaining the same or similar facts, information, or evidence for use in any criminal prosecution.

No professional shall be examined in any criminal case without the consent of the respondent as to statements made pursuant to compliance with court treatment orders, including protective orders, entered under this article; except that such privilege
shall not apply to any discussion of any future misconduct or of any other past misconduct unrelated to the allegations involved in the treatment plan. The admissibility of testimony as set forth in this subsection (2) shall not
be subject to the hearing and notice provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

(2.5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a juvenile's statements to a professional made in the course of treatment ordered by the court pursuant to this article shall not, without the juvenile's consent, be admitted into evidence
in any criminal or juvenile delinquency case brought against the juvenile; except that the privilege shall not apply to statements regarding future misconduct.

No admission made by a respondent in open court or by written pleading filed with the court to a petition in dependency or neglect may be used against him or her in any criminal prosecution, except for purposes of impeachment or rebuttal.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 762, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 90:
(2) amended, p. 1037, § 4, effective April 3.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 518, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
(2.5) added, p. 274, § 1, effective April 5.

19-3-208. Services - county required to provide - out-of-home placement options - rules - definitions.

Each county or city and county shall provide a set of services, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, to children who are in out-of-home placement or meet the social services out-of-home placement criteria and to their families in the state of
Colorado eligible for such services as determined necessary by an assessment and a case plan. A county or city and county may enter into an agreement with any other county, city and county, or group of counties to share in the
provision of these services. Each county, city and county, or group of counties may enter into contracts with private entities for the provision of these services. Each county or city and county shall have a process in place whereby
services can readily be accessed by children and families determined to be in need of such services described in subsection (2) of this section. For the purposes of this subsection (1), the requirements of providing services or
a process shall be made available based upon the state's capacity to increase federal funding or any other moneys appropriated for these services.

(1.5) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"School of origin" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-32-138.

"Student in out-of-home placement" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-32-138.

"Services" shall be designed to accomplish the following goals:

Promote the immediate health, safety, and well-being of children eligible for these services based upon the case assessment and individual case plan;

Reduce the risk of future maltreatment of children who have previously been abused or neglected and protect the siblings of such children and other children who are members of the same household who may be subjected to maltreatment;

Avoid the unnecessary placement of children into foster care resulting from child abuse and neglect, voluntary decisions by families, or the commission of status offenses;

Facilitate, if appropriate, the speedy reunification of parents with any of their children who have been placed in out-of-home placement;

Ensure that the placement of a child is neither delayed nor denied due to consideration of the race, color, or national origin of the child or any other person unless such consideration is permitted pursuant to federal law; and

Promote the best interests of the child.

The following services must be available and provided, as determined necessary and appropriate by individual case plans:

Screening; assessments, including those required by the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act" of 2018, Titles IV-B and IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended; and individual case plans;

Home-based family and crisis counseling;

Information and referral services to available public and private assistance resources;

Visitation services for parents with children or youth in out-of-home placement;

Placement services including foster care and emergency shelter; and

Services including but not limited to transportation and case planning, as necessary for a student in out-of-home placement to remain in his or her school of origin, unless the county department determines that remaining in the school of origin is not
in the student's best interest.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1054, § 4, effective May 4, 1994.)

The following services must be made available and provided based upon the state's capacity to increase federal funding or any other money appropriated for these services and as determined necessary and appropriate by individual case plans:

Transportation to these services when other appropriate transportation is not available;

Child care as needed according to a case plan, when other child care is not available;

In-home supportive homemaker services;

Diagnostic, mental health, and health-care services;

Drug and alcohol treatment services;

After care services to prevent a return to out-of-home placement;

Family support services while a child is in out-of-home placement including home-based services, family counseling, and placement alternative services;

Financial services in order to prevent placement;

Family preservation services, which are brief, comprehensive, and intensive services provided to prevent the out-of-home placement of children or to promote the safe return of children to the home; and

Foster care prevention services.

On or before January 1, 2022, the department of human services, in cooperation with county departments of human or social services, shall analyze necessary data to assess and determine the number of placements necessary for each level of care for children
or youth who are in out-of-home placements.

On or before July 1, 2022, the department of human services, in consultation with the department of health care policy and financing, shall develop and implement a plan to build capacity and develop appropriate and available out-of-home placement options
for each necessary level of care in the state in order to serve the number of children and youth who require a given level of care.

The department of human services may promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the provision of services pursuant to this article.

It is the intent of the general assembly to use existing general fund moneys which have serviced the programs described in this subsection (2) to access federal funds.

Services provided pursuant to this section are required to meet the provisions of the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., and its related amendments and implementing regulations.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(a) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The state board of human services shall promulgate rules creating a standard and deliberate process for determining, in coordination with the education provider, parents,
if appropriate, guardian ad litem, and the child or youth, whether it is in the best interest of a child or youth in out-of-home placement to remain in his or her school of origin when the child or youth is placed in out-of-home
placement or experiences a change in placement.

(3)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(a) is effective January 9, 2023.] The state board of human services shall promulgate rules creating a standard and deliberate process for determining, in coordination with the education provider, parents,
if appropriate, guardian ad litem or counsel for youth, and the child, whether it is in the best interest of a child in out-of-home placement to remain in the child's school of origin when the child is placed in out-of-home
placement or experiences a change in placement.

Each county department of human or social services shall coordinate with school districts and the state charter school institute to establish systems-level plans for how necessary transportation to a school of origin will be provided, arranged, and funded
for the duration of a child or youth's time as a student in out-of-home placement, including the equitable allocation of costs.

The department of human services shall provide technical assistance and compliance monitoring for the county departments of human or social services to ensure that county departments of human or social services are properly implementing this subsection
(3), including administering funds to allow students in out-of-home placement to remain in their schools of origin, with transportation provided.

Any state funds expended pursuant to this section for children eligible under Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, shall be counted to satisfy matching requirements for federal funds received pursuant to that act.

Source:

L. 93:
Entire section added, p. 2014, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(1), (2)(c), and IP(2)(d) amended, p. 1054, § 4, effective May 4; (2)(a) amended, p. 672, § 1, effective July 1; (2)(e) amended, p. 2682, § 197, effective July 1.

L. 2008:
(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 812, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2010:
(2)(a)(V) amended, (HB 10-1106), ch. 278, p. 1274, § 5, effective May 26.

L. 2018:
(2)(g) added, (HB 18-1104), ch. 164, p. 1134, § 6, effective April 25; IP(2)(b) and (2)(b)(I) amended, (SB 18-254), ch. 216, p. 1373, § 1, effective May 18; (1.5), (2)(b)(VI), and (3) added and IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(IV), and
(2)(b)(V) amended, (HB 18-1306), ch. 364, p. 2181, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2019:
IP(2)(d), (2)(d)(VIII), and (2)(d)(IX) amended and (2)(d)(X) added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2460, § 5, effective August 2.

L. 2021:
(2)(d.5) and (2)(d.7) added, (SB 21-278), ch. 344, p. 2241, § 2, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(3)(a) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 441, § 22, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
Amendments to subsection IP(2)(b) by SB 18-254 and HB 18-1306 were harmonized.

Cross references:
(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1306, see section 1 of chapter 364, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

(2) For Title IV-B of the "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. § 621 et seq. For Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.

19-3-208.5. Pilot program - legislative declaration - child welfare - mental health services - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:
Entire section added, p. 812, § 2, effective May 14.

L. 2009:
(4), (5), (8), and (9) amended, (SB 09-207), ch. 8, p. 60, § 1, effective March 2.

L. 2018:
(8) amended, (SB 18-164), ch. 37, p. 394, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
Subsection (9) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2009, p. 60.)

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-164, see section 1 of chapter 37, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-3-209. Individual case plan - required.

An individual case plan, developed with the input or participation of the family, is required to be in place for all abused and neglected children and the families of such children in each case which is opened for the provision of services beyond the
investigation of the report of child abuse or neglect, regardless of whether the child or children involved are placed out of the home or under court supervision.

Source:

L. 93:
Entire section added, p. 2014, § 4, effective July 1.